da: Medfølgende komponenter til tom-holder: Kugle-/ledsamling; Kun klemme/beslag; Komplet monteringssæt; Montering/beslag medfølger; Memory lock(s) medfølger; Monteringsplade medfølger; Modtager + tom-arm; Kun modtager; Kun tom-arm; Andet
en: Tom mount components included: Ball + socket assembly; Clamp/Bracket only; Complete mounting kit; Hardware/fasteners included; Memory lock(s) included; Mounting plate included; Receiver + tom arm; Receiver only; Tom arm only; Other
sv: Komponenter för tomfäste som ingår: Kula + led-montering; Endast klämma/fäste; Komplett monteringskit; Hårdvara/fästelement ingår; Minneslås ingår; Monteringsplatta ingår; Mottagare + pukarm; Endast mottagare; Endast pukarm; Övrigt
ja: トムマウントコンポーネント付き: ボール + ソケットアセンブリ; クランプ/ブラケットのみ; コンプリートマウントキット; ハードウェア/ファスナー付属; メモリーロック付属; マウントプレート付属; レシーバー + タムアーム; レシーバーのみ; タムアームのみ; その他
nb: Inkluderte komponenter i tomstativ: Kule- og skålmontering; Kun klemme/brakett; Komplett monteringssett; Maskinvare/fester inkludert; Minnelås(er) inkludert; Monteringsplate inkludert; Mottaker og tom-arm; Kun mottaker; Kun tom-arm; Annet
de: Beim Tom-Halter inbegriffene Komponenten: Kugel- und Pfannenbaugruppe; Nur Klemme/Halterung; Komplettes Montage-Set; Hardware/Befestigungselemente inbegriffen; Memory Lock(s) inbegriffen; Montageplatte inbegriffen; Aufnahme + Tom-Arm; Nur Aufnahme; Nur Tom-Arm; Sonstige
tr: Dahil olan tom montaj bileşenleri: Bilyeli mafsal tertibatı; Yalnızca kelepçe/braket; Eksiksiz montaj kiti; Donanım/bağlantı elemanları dahil; Hafıza kilitleri dahil; Montaj plakası dahil; Alıcı + tom kolu; Yalnızca alıcı; Yalnızca tom kolu; Diğer
lt-LT: Pridedami tomtomų laikiklių komponentai: Šarnyro mazgas; Tik spaustukas / laikiklis; Pilnas tvirtinimo rinkinys; Pridedama tvirtinimo įranga / tvirtinimo detalės; Pridedamas (-i) atminties užraktas (-ai); Pridedama tvirtinimo plokštė; Imtuvas ir tomo svirtis; Tik imtuvas; Tik tomo svirtis; Kita
es: Componentes incluidos del soporte para tom: Ensamblaje de rótula; Solo abrazadera/soporte; Kit de montaje completo; Tornillería/fijaciones incluidas; Bloqueos de memoria incluidos; Placa de montaje incluida; Receptor + brazo del tom; Solo receptor; Solo brazo del tom; Otro
th: ส่วนประกอบของขาตั้งกลองทอมที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: ชุดประกอบลูกหมาก + เบ้า; เฉพาะแคลมป์/แบร็กเก็ต; ชุดติดตั้งแบบครบชุด; รวมฮาร์ดแวร์/อุปกรณ์ยึด; รวมเมมโมรี่ล็อก; รวมแผ่นยึด; ตัวรับ + แขนจับทอม; เฉพาะตัวรับ; เฉพาะแขนจับทอม; อื่นๆ
fi: Tomitelineen mukana tulevat osat: Pallo- ja nivelrakenne; Vain puristin/pidike; Täydellinen asennussarja; Sisältää kiinnikkeet; Sisältää muistilukon; Sisältää asennuslevyn; Pidike ja tomin varsi; Vain pidike; Vain tomin varsi; Muu
ru: Комплектация крепления том-тома: Шарнирная сборка; Только зажим/кронштейн; Полный монтажный комплект; Оборудование/крепеж в комплекте; Замок(и) памяти в комплекте; Монтажная пластина в комплекте; Держатель + кронштейн тома; Только держатель; Только кронштейн тома; Другое
cs: Komponenty uchycení tom v balení: Sestava kulového kloubu; Pouze svorka/držák; Kompletní montážní sada; Včetně kování/spojovacího materiálu; Včetně paměťových zámků; Včetně montážní desky; Objímka + rameno pro tom-tom; Pouze objímka; Pouze rameno pro tom-tom; Jiné
hu: Tom dob rögzítőelemei a csomagban: Gömb- és foglalatszerelvény; Csak bilincs/konzol; Teljes rögzítőkészlet; Kötőelemekkel/rögzítőkkel; Memóriazár(ak) mellékelve; Rögzítőlemezzel; Befogó + tamtartó kar; Csak befogó; Csak tamtartó kar; Egyéb
el: Περιλαμβάνονται εξαρτήματα βάσης tom: Διάταξη μπίλιας και υποδοχής; Μόνο σφιγκτήρας/βραχίονας; Πλήρες κιτ τοποθέτησης; Περιλαμβάνεται εξοπλισμός/συνδετήρες; Περιλαμβάνονται memory locks; Περιλαμβάνεται πλάκα τοποθέτησης; Υποδοχέας + βραχίονας τομ; Μόνο υποδοχέας; Μόνο βραχίονας τομ; Άλλο
zh-TW: 包含筒鼓安裝組件: 球與插座組件; 僅夾具/支架; 完整安裝套件; 包含五金/緊固件; 包含記憶鎖; 包含安裝板; 接收器 + 中鼓支臂; 僅接收器; 僅中鼓支臂; 其他
sl-SI: Vključene komponente nosilca za prehode: Kroglični zglob in ležišče; Samo objemka/nosilec; Celoten komplet za montažo; Vključeno okovje/vijaki; Vključene spominske objemke; Vključena montažna plošča; Sprejemnik in roka za tom; Samo sprejemnik; Samo roka za tom; Drugo
vi: Các linh kiện lắp gắn trống Tom đi kèm: Cụm ổ cắm và trục bi; Chỉ có kẹp/giá đỡ; Bộ gắn hoàn chỉnh; Kèm phụ kiện/ốc vít; Kèm khóa nhớ; Kèm bản mã; Ngàm nhận + Cần đỡ tom; Chỉ có ngàm nhận; Chỉ có cần đỡ tom; Khác
pt-BR: Componentes da fixação superior incluídos: Conjunto esfera + soquete; Apenas grampo/suporte; Kit de montagem completo; Ferragens/fixadores incluídos; Trava(s) de memória incluída(s); Placa de montagem incluída; Receptor + braço do tom; Apenas receptor; Apenas braço do tom; Outros
nl: Inbegrepen onderdelen tommontage: Kogelgewricht-montage; Alleen klem/beugel; Complete montagekit; Inclusief bevestigingsmateriaal; Inclusief memory lock(s); Inclusief montageplaat; Ontvanger + tom-arm; Alleen ontvanger; Alleen tom-arm; Overige
sk-SK: Komponenty na montáž tom zostavy bubnov v cene: Guľový kĺb s puzdrom; Len svorka/držiak; Kompletná montážna súprava; Vrátane montážneho materiálu/spojovacích prvkov; Vrátane pamäťových objímok; Vrátane montážnej dosky; Záchyt a rameno pre tom; Len záchyt; Len rameno pre tom; Iné
fr: Composants de fixation Tom inclus: Ensemble rotule et douille; Pince/support uniquement; Kit de montage complet; Matériel/fixations inclus; Bague(s) mémoire incluse(s); Plaque de montage incluse; Support de fixation + bras de tom; Support de fixation uniquement; Bras de tom uniquement; Autre
hr-HR: Uključene komponente nosača toma: Sklop s kuglom i ležištem; Samo stezaljka/nosač; Potpuni komplet za montažu; Uključen okov/pričvršćivači; Uključena memorijska brava (ili više njih); Uključena montažna ploča; Prijemnik i ruka za tom; Samo prijemnik; Samo ruka za tom; Ostalo
pl: Elementy mocowania toma w zestawie: Zespół kulowy z gniazdem; Tylko zacisk/wspornik; Kompletny zestaw montażowy; Osprzęt/elementy złączne w zestawie; Blokada pamięci w zestawie; Płyta montażowa w zestawie; Uchwyt mocujący + ramię do tomu; Tylko uchwyt mocujący; Tylko ramię do tomu; Inne
pt-PT: Componentes do suporte para timbalões incluídos: Conjunto de esfera e encaixe; Apenas abraçadeira/suporte; Kit de montagem completo; Equipamento/fixadores incluídos; Bloqueio(s) de memória incluído(s); Placa de montagem incluída; Recetor + braço de timbalão; Apenas recetor; Apenas braço de timbalão; Outros
it: Componenti del supporto per tom inclusi: Gruppo sfera e incastro; Solo morsetto/staffa; Kit di montaggio completo; Hardware/fissaggi inclusi; Blocchi di memoria inclusi; Piastra di montaggio inclusa; Ricevitore + braccio del tom; Solo ricevitore; Solo braccio del tom; Altro
ko: 탐 마운트 구성품 포함: 볼 및 소켓 조립품; 클램프/브래킷만 포함; 장착 키트 전체; 하드웨어/패스너 포함; 메모리 록 포함; 장착 플레이트 포함; 리시버 및 탐 암; 리시버만 포함; 탐 암만 포함; 기타
ro-RO: Componente incluse pentru montarea tom-ului: Ansamblu cu sferă și articulație; Doar clemă/suport; Kit complet de montare; Feronerie/elemente de fixare incluse; Sistem(e) de blocare de memorie inclus(e); Placă de montare inclusă; Receptor + braț tom; Doar receptor; Doar braț tom; Altele
bg-BG: Включени компоненти за монтаж на том: Сферична става и гнездо; Само скоба/планка; Пълен монтажен комплект; Включени крепежни елементи; Включени мемори ключове; Включена монтажна планка; Приемник и рамо за том; Само приемник; Само рамо за том; Друго
zh-CN: 包括嗵鼓支架组件: 球头及套接组件; 仅提供夹具/支架; 完整安装套件; 包含五金件/紧固件; 包含记忆锁; 包含安装板; 接收座和嗵鼓悬臂; 仅提供接收座; 仅提供嗵鼓悬臂; 其他